Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
CHAPTER 2 Standards and Requirements for
Construction, and Alteration,
of Buildings and Other
Structures

Cross references.

Standards and requirements for construction of public school buildings, §

20-2-16

.

Promulgation of rules and regulations by Safety Fire Commissioner regarding fire hazards in hotels, apartment houses, places of public assembly, and other places, §

25-2-19

.

Fire inspections of buildings, §

25-2-22

et seq.

Access to and use of public buildings and accommodations by physically handicapped persons, §§

30-3-1

et seq., and

30-4-1

et seq.

Standards and requirements governing installation of sewage management systems, § 31-3-5.1.

General duty of owner of public building or place of public assembly to construct, repair, and maintain such facility so as to render facility reasonably safe, §

34-2-10

.

Prohibition against use of construction plans and specifications not prepared by or under supervision of registered professional engineer or architect, §

43-15-24

.

Sanitary regulations for hotels and inns, §

43-21-30

et seq.

Law reviews.

For survey article on contracts — legislation, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 71 (1982).